Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska75-144
Order; violation; injunction; penalty.

(1) If it appears to the court after a hearing that an order of the commission has been violated or disobeyed, the court may issue an injunction or other proper process, mandatory or otherwise, to restrain the person from further continuing such violation or disobedience of the order and enjoining disobedience to the order.

(2) In case of any disobedience of any injunction or other proper process, mandatory or otherwise, the person to whom it was directed shall be guilty of contempt of court. The court may issue a writ of attachment or other process of the court incident or applicable to an injunction or other proper process, mandatory or otherwise, against the person to pay any sum of money, not exceeding, for each such person, the sum of one thousand dollars for every day after a day to be named in the order that the person fails to obey the injunction or other proper process, mandatory or otherwise.

(3) The money shall, when paid, be disposed of according to law. The payment of the money may, without prejudice to any other motive covering the same, be enforced by attachment or order in the nature of a writ of execution, in like manner as if the money had been recovered by final decree in personam in such court.

Laws 1963, c. 425, art. I, § 44, p. 1370;

Laws 1993, LB 42, § 15;

Laws 1994, LB 414, § 57.